District of Columbia statutes.
50-1609

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter the term:

(1)

“Bicycle” means a human-powered vehicle with wheels designed to transport, by pedaling, one or more persons seated on one or more saddle seats on its frame. “Bicycle” also includes a human-powered vehicle, and any attachment to the vehicle designed to transport by pedaling when the vehicle is used on a public roadway, public bicycle path or other public right-of-way. The term “Bicycle” also includes a “tricycle,” which is a 3-wheeled human-powered vehicle designed for use as a toy by a single child under 6 years of age, the seat of which is no more than 2 feet from ground level.

(1A)

“Identification number” means a numbered stamp, sticker, or other label or plate issued for a bicycle for the purpose of identifying the bicycle as having been registered, including any sticker or label provided by the National Bike Registry or a registry established by the Mayor for the purpose of bicycle registration. The term “identification number” shall also include a serial number that is originally inscribed or affixed by the manufacturer to a bicycle frame or a bicycle part for the purpose of identification.

(1B)

“National Bike Registry” means the nationwide computer database for the registration of bicycles that is an official licensee of the National Crime Prevention Council and is accessible at www.nationalbikeregistry.com or at 1-800-848-BIKE.

(2)

“Operator” means a person under 16 years of age who travels on a bicycle seated on a saddle seat from which that person is intended to and can pedal the bicycle.

(3)

“Other public right-of-way” means any right of way other than a public roadway or public bicycle path that is under the jurisdiction and control of the District of Columbia and is designed for use and used by vehicular or pedestrian traffic.

(4)

“Passenger” means any person, under 16 years of age, who travels on a bicycle in any manner except as an operator.

(5)

“Protective bicycle helmet” means a piece of headgear which meets or exceeds the impact standards for protective bicycle helmets set by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) or the Snell Memorial Foundation’s standards for protective headgear or the American Society for testing and Materials (ASTM) for use in bicycling.

(6)

“Public bicycle path” means a right-of-way under the jurisdiction and control of the District of Columbia for use primarily by bicycles and pedestrians.

(7)

“Public roadway” means a right-of-way under the jurisdiction and control of the District of Columbia for use primarily by motor vehicles.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 10, 32 DCR 764
as added May 23, 2000, D.C. Law 13-112, § 2(b), 47 DCR 1985
May 1, 2008, D.C. Law 17-149, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1272

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3234 and § 50-1605.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-149 added pars. (1A) and (1B).